Washington statutes.
RCW 43.160.035

Designees for board members.

Each member of the house of representatives who is appointed to the community economic revitalization board under RCW 43.160.030 may designate another member from the house of representatives to take his or her place on the board for meetings at which the member will be absent, as long as the designated member belongs to the same caucus. The designee shall have all powers to vote and participate in board deliberations as have the other board members. Each member of the senate who is appointed to the community economic revitalization board under RCW 43.160.030 may designate another member from the senate to take his or her place on the board for meetings at which the member will be absent, as long as the designated member belongs to the same caucus. The designee shall have all powers to vote and participate in board deliberations as have the other board members. Each agency head of an executive agency who is appointed to serve as a nonvoting advisory member of the community economic revitalization board under RCW 43.160.030 may designate an agency employee to take his or her place on the board for meetings at which the agency head will be absent. The designee will have all powers to participate in board deliberations as have the other board members but shall not have voting powers.

[ 2003 c 151 s 2; 1993 c 320 s 3; 1987 c 422 s 3; 1985 c 446 s 4.]